Arkansas, session 2025, SB554.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 81, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 21 — Behavioral Health Loan Forgiveness Program

6-81-2101. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Behaviorally underserved community” means a given
geographical area in this state that the Secretary of the Department of Human
Services determines has unmet needs for behavioral health services caused by
factors, including without limitation:
(A) The ratio of mental health professionals to the
population in the given geographical area;
(B) The ratio of licensed alcoholism and substance abuse
counselors to the population in the given geographical area;
(C) The percentage of the population with incomes below
the federal poverty level in the given geographical area;
(D) Accessibility within the given geographical area to
*JMB366*
03/20/2025 4:13:24 PM JMB366

SB554
mental health professionals and alcoholism and substance use counselors; and
(E) Other relevant criteria the secretary may deem
necessary for a determination of unmet needs for behavioral health services
in the given geographical area;
(2) “Eligible loan” means the student loan debt incurred by a
participant to become a mental health professional or a licensed alcoholism
and drug abuse counselor;
(3) “Licensed alcoholism and drug abuse counselor” means the
same as defined in § 17-27-401;
(4) “Mental health professional” means a psychiatrist,
psychologist, advanced practice registered nurse, therapist, counselor, or
social worker licensed in this state and certified by the Division of Aging,
Adult, and Behavioral Health Services of the Department of Human Services;
and
(5) “Participant” means a mental health professional or a
licensed alcoholism and substance abuse counselor who has been selected by
the secretary to participate in the Behavioral Health Loan Forgiveness
Program.

6-81-2102. Creation.
(a) There is created the Behavioral Health Loan Forgiveness Program to
be administered by the Department of Human Services in accordance with the
provisions of this subchapter.
(b) The program shall promote mental health professionals serving in
behaviorally underserved communities in this state by providing participants
with payments toward eligible loans in accordance with this subchapter.

6-81-2103. Secretary of Department of Human Services powers and
duties.
The Secretary of the Department of Human Services shall:
(1) Determine the behaviorally underserved communities in this
state;
(2) Prescribe forms for and regulate the submission of
applications for possible participants in the Behavioral Health Loan
Forgiveness Program;
(3) Determine eligibility of applicants;
03/20/2025 4:13:24 PM JMB366

SB554
(4) Select applicants each year for participation in the program
within the limits of available funding;
(5) Select applicants for the program based on their suitability
for best addressing the unmet needs of behaviorally underserved communities
as indicated by experience or training;
(6) Give preference to applicants for the program closest to
completing their training or having completed their training;
(7) Otherwise administer the program; and
(8) Promulgate reasonable rules necessary to implement this
subchapter, including rules addressing the requirements and in conformance
with the requirements of the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-
201 et seq., and other appropriate state laws in promulgating and placing
rules into effect to establish the program.

6-81-2104. Eligibility.
(a) To be eligible to be a participant, an individual shall:
(1) Either:
(A) Be a mental health professional or a licensed
alcoholism and substance abuse counselor; or
(B) Be enrolled in a training or education program to
become a mental health professional or a licensed alcoholism and substance
abuse counselor; and
(2) Submit an application for the Behavioral Health Loan
Forgiveness Program.
(b) An applicant selected to be a participant shall sign a contract to
agree to serve a minimum three-year full-time service obligation as a mental
health professional or a licensed alcoholism and substance abuse counselor in
behaviorally underserved communities.
(c) A participant shall:
(1) Secure his or her own qualified educational loans;
(2) Verify to the Secretary of the Department of Human Services
with documentation the amount of the participant’s eligible loans; and
(3) Designate to the secretary a particular eligible loan toward
which the participant will use any loan repayment disbursement from the
Arkansas Behavioral Health Professional Student Loan Repayment Fund.

03/20/2025 4:13:24 PM JMB366

SB554
6-81-2105. Disbursement.
(a)(1) The Secretary of the Department of Human Services shall
distribute available funds from the Arkansas Behavioral Health Professional
Student Loan Repayment Fund to participants proportionally among the eligible
professions according to the vacancy rate for mental health professionals and
licensed alcoholism and substance abuse counselors.
(2) If the secretary does not receive enough qualified
applicants each year to use the entire allocation of funds for one (1)
eligible profession, the remaining funds may be allocated proportionally
among the other eligible professions according to the vacancy rate for each
profession, as determined by the secretary.
(b) Upon the completion of each year that a participant meets the
service obligation required under § 6-81-2104(b), up to a maximum of three
(3) years, the secretary shall make annual disbursements from the fund
directly to the participant in an amount equivalent to fifteen percent (15%)
of the average educational debt for indebted graduates in the participant’s
profession in the year closest to the participant’s selection for the
Behavioral Health Loan Forgiveness Program for which information is
available, not to exceed the balance of the participant’s qualifying
educational loans.
(c)(1) Before receiving loan repayment disbursements from the fund and
as requested by the secretary, a participant shall complete and return to the
secretary a confirmation of practice form provided by the secretary verifying
that the participant is practicing as required under § 6-81-2104(b).
(2) A participant who moves their practice to a new location
remains eligible for loan repayment in the program as long as he or she
practices as required under § 6-81-2104(b).
(3) The participant shall verify to the secretary with
documentation that the full amount of loan repayment disbursement from the
fund received by the participant as part of the program has been applied
toward the designated eligible loan.
(4) The secretary shall not make an additional loan repayment
disbursement to a participant from the fund until the verification required
by subdivision (c)(3) of this section has been received by the secretary.
(d)(1) If a participant does not fulfill the contract of service
required under § 6-81-2104(b), the secretary shall:
03/20/2025 4:13:24 PM JMB366

SB554
(A) Collect from the participant the total amount paid to
the participant under the program plus interest at a rate of five percent
(5%) per annum; and
(B) Deposit the money collected under this subchapter into
the fund.
(2) The secretary shall allow waivers of all or part of the
money owed to the secretary as a result of the nonfulfillment penalty under
subdivision (d)(1) of this section if, subject to the secretary’s discretion,
exigent circumstances prevented the participant’s fulfillment of the terms of
the contract required by § 6-81-2104(b).

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 19, Chapter 5, Subchapter 12, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
19-5-1288. Arkansas Behavioral Health Professional Student Loan
Repayment Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the "Arkansas Behavioral Health Professional Student Loan
Repayment Fund".
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Moneys obtained from private or public grants, gifts, or
donations that are designated to be credited to the fund; and
(2) Any other funds authorized, appropriated, or provided by
law.
(c) The fund shall be used by the Department of Human Services to
create and maintain the Behavioral Health Loan Forgiveness Program under § 6-
81-2101 et seq.
(d) Moneys remaining in the fund at the end of each fiscal year shall
carry forward and be made available for the purposes stated in this section
in the next fiscal year.
(e) The Secretary of the Department of Human Services shall:
(1) Administer and disburse the fund;
(2) Manage, operate, and control all funds and property
appropriated or otherwise contributed to the fund for the program;
(3) Accept gifts, grants, bequests, or devises and apply them to
the fund as a part of the program;
03/20/2025 4:13:24 PM JMB366

SB554
(4) Accept moneys from federal programs that may be used for
furtherance of the program; and
(5) Promulgate reasonable rules necessary to implement this
section, including rules addressing the requirements and in conformance with
the requirements of the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et
seq., and other appropriate state laws in promulgating and placing rules into
effect to establish the fund.





























03/20/2025 4:13:24 PM JMB366